Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB934.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1748-A(a) and (b) of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, amended July 11, 2024 (P.L.618, No.55), are amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 1748-A. Enrollment and notification.(a) Notice to school district.--(1) Within 10 days of the enrollment of a student to a cyber charter school, the parent or guardian and the cyber charter school shall notify the student's school district of residence of the enrollment through the use of the notification form under subsection (b). The parent or guardian of a student enrolled in a cyber charter school 1234567891011121314151617181920 shall also use the form developed under subsection (b) to submit continued proof of the student's residence to the student's school district of residence by November 1 and by March 1 of each school year. THE NOTIFICATION FORM OF A NEWLY ENROLLED CYBER CHARTER STUDENT SHALL SATISFY THE FIRST NOVEMBER 1 OR MARCH 1 NOTIFICATION DEADLINE, WHICHEVER IS SOONER. A STUDENT IDENTIFIED BY THE SCHOOL DISTRICT OF RESIDENCE OR THE CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL AS HOMELESS UNDER 42 U.S.C. § 11302 (RELATING TO GENERAL DEFINITION OF HOMELESS INDIVIDUAL) MAY NOT BE REQUIRED TO SUBMIT THE HOME ADDRESS INFORMATION REQUIRED IN SUBSECTION (B)(1) OR THE INFORMATION REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (B)(6).(2) If a school district which has received notice under paragraph (1) OR (A.1) determines AT ANY TIME that a student is not a resident of the school district, the following apply:(i) [Within seven days of receipt of the notice under paragraph (1), the] The school district shall notify the cyber charter school and the department that the student is not a resident of the school district. Notification of nonresidence shall include the basis for the determination.(ii) [Within seven days of notification under subparagraph (i), the cyber charter school] The department shall review the notification of nonresidence[, respond to the school district and provide a copy of the response to the department. If the cyber charter school agrees that a] AND MAKE A FINAL DETERMINATION WITHIN 15 DAYS . If the department determines that the student is not a resident of the 20250SB0934PN1056 - 2 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 school district, [it shall determine] the department shall notify the cyber charter school of the student's proper district of residence. [of the student before requesting funds from another school district.(iii) Within seven days of receipt of the response under subparagraph (ii), the school district shall notify the cyber charter school that it agrees with the cyber charter school's determination or does not agree with the cyber charter school's determination.(iv) A school district that has notified the cyber charter school that it does not agree with the cyber charter school's determination under subparagraph (iii) shall appeal to the department for a final determination.](v) All decisions of the department regarding the school district of residence of a student shall be subject to review by the Commonwealth Court.(vi) A school district shall continue to make payments to a cyber charter school under section 1725-A during the time in which the school district of residence of a student is in dispute.(vii) If a final determination is made that a student is not a resident of an appealing school district, the cyber charter school shall return all funds provided on behalf of that student during the period for which the student is not a resident of the school district to the school district within 30 days.(a.1) Employee report of nonresidency.--(1) If an employee of a cyber charter school makes a good faith report to the cyber charter school that a student 20250SB0934PN1056 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 does not reside within the school district that has received notice of the student's enrollment under subsection (a), the cyber charter school shall immediately investigate the employee's report and provide the student's alleged school district of residence and the department with written notice that there is a concern REPORT of nonresidency. (2) NOT LATER THAN 15 DAYS AFTER RECEIVING THE EMPLOYEE REPORT OF NONRESIDENCY, THE CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL SHALL INVESTIGATE AND REPORT ITS FINDINGS TO THE DEPARTMENT AND TO THE ALLEGED SCHOOL DISTRICT.(2) (3) Notwithstanding any provision of the act of December 12, 1986 (P.L.1559, No.169), known as the Whistleblower Law, or any other law to the contrary, a cyber charter school may not discharge, threaten or otherwise discriminate or retaliate against an employee regarding the employee's compensation, terms, conditions, location or privileges of employment because the employee makes a good faith report under this subsection.(b) Notification form.--The department shall develop a notification form, WHICH MAY BE ELECTRONIC, for use under subsection (a). The notification shall include:(1) The name, home address and mailing address of the student.(2) The grade in which the student is being enrolled.(3) The date the student will be enrolled.(4) The name and address of the cyber charter school and the name and telephone number of a contact person able to provide information regarding the cyber charter school.(5) The signature of the parent or guardian and an authorized representative of the cyber charter school.20250SB0934PN1056 - 4 - <--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (6) Proof of residency, which shall be a document containing the parent or guardian's name and address, on any of the following:(i) An active residential lease agreement or a mortgage statement no more than three months old.(ii) A bank statement no more than three months old or a utility or Internet bill no more than three months old.(iii) A tax bill no more than three months old.(iv) An insurance document no more than three months old.(v) Any other document determined acceptable by the department.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0934PN1056 - 5 - 123456789101112131415